Mississippi, session 2026, HB31.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 45-35-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-35-7.  (1)  (a)  Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1), each applicant for an original or renewal identification card issued pursuant to this chapter who is entitled to issuance of such a card shall be issued a four-year card or an eight-year card, at the option of the applicant.  Each card shall expire at midnight on the cardholder's birthday and may be renewed any time within six (6) months before the expiration date of the card upon application and payment of the required fee. (b)  Any applicant who is blind, as defined in Section 43-6-1, upon payment of the fee prescribed in Section 63-1-43, shall be issued an original or renewal identification card which shall remain valid for a period of eight (8) years, shall expire at midnight on the cardholder's birthday, and may be renewed any time within six (6) months before the expiration date of the card upon application and payment of the required fee. (2)  (a)  Any applicant who is not a United States citizen, upon payment of the fee prescribed in Section 63-1-43, shall be issued an original or renewal identification card which shall expire four (4) years from date of issuance or on the expiration date of the applicant's authorized stay in the United States, whichever is the lesser period of time, and may be renewed, if the person is otherwise qualified to renew the license, within thirty (30) days of expiration. (b)  An applicant for an original or renewal identification card under paragraph (a) must present valid documentary evidence documenting that the applicant: (i)  Is a citizen or national of the United States; (ii)  Is an alien lawfully admitted for permanent or temporary residence in the United States; (iii)  Has conditional permanent residence status in the United States; (iv)  Has an approved application for asylum in the United States or has entered into the United States in refugee status; (v)  Has a valid, unexpired nonimmigrant visa or nonimmigrant visa status for entry into or lawful presence in the United States; (vi)  Has a pending application for asylum in the United States; (vii)  Has a pending or approved application for temporary protected status in the United States; (viii)  Has approved deferred-action status; (ix)  Has pending an application for adjustment of status to that of an alien lawfully admitted for permanent residence in the United States or conditional permanent resident status in the United States; or (x)  Has a valid employment authorization card issued by the United States Department of Homeland Security. (3)  The fee for the issuance of an original or renewal identification card shall be as prescribed in Section 63-1-43. (4)  (a)  Any person who, for medical reasons, surrenders his unexpired driver's license, and any person whose unexpired driver's license is suspended for medical reasons by the Commissioner of Public Safety under Section 63-1-53(2)(e), upon request shall be issued an identification card without payment of a fee.  The identification card shall be valid for a period of four (4) years from its date of issue. Subsequent renewals shall be subject to the fees prescribed in Section 63-1-43. (b)  Any person who is permanently disabled and receives hospice care in a residential home, or is a permanent resident of a nursing home, assisted living facility, or hospice care facility upon request, shall be issued a permanent identification card without charge of a fee.  The address of the nursing home, assisted living facility, hospice care facility or residential home in which hospice care is received shall be reflected on the card as the address of residence.  Such person shall also be exempt from the renewal requirements of this section.  Proof of permanent disability and residency authorized by this paragraph (b) shall be required for the exemption provided by this paragraph.  If the person moves out of the nursing home or assisted living facility for any reason, the described exemption shall not apply and the applicable fees and renewal requirements of this section shall otherwise be applied. (5)  The department shall maintain a record of all identification cards issued. (6)  (a)  Any male who is at least eighteen (18) years of age but less than twenty-six (26) years of age and who applies for an identification card or a renewal of an identification card under this chapter shall be registered in compliance with the requirements of Section 3 of the Military Selective Service Act, 50 USCS Appx 451 et seq., as amended. (b)  The department shall forward in an electronic format the necessary personal information of the applicant to the Selective Service System.  The applicant's submission of the application shall serve as an indication that the applicant either has already registered with the Selective Service System or that he is authorizing the department to forward to the Selective Service System the necessary information for registration.  The commissioner shall notify the applicant on, or as a part of, the application that his submission of the application will serve as his consent to registration with the Selective Service System, if so required.  The commissioner also shall notify any male applicant under the age of eighteen (18) that he will be registered upon turning age eighteen (18) as required by federal law. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.